Hawaii, session 2026, SB1171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 141-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§141-17[]]  Fine meshed nets; invasive species; permissible; rules.  (a)  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, fine meshed nets, including monofilament netting of one-half to three-inch mesh, may be used for the protection of plants against invasive species, as determined by the department of agriculture; provided that the fine meshed nets shall be applied in a manner that is unlikely to entangle birds, become dislodged and enter water, or entangle or disturb native and beneficial animals, including but not limited to pollinators, ladybugs or lady beetles, and net-winged insects. (b)  The department of agriculture shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 to implement this section, including but not limited to establishing requirements related to filament diameter, color, and the inclusion of visual cues to prevent non-targeted entanglement; [and] prohibiting the use of mist net material that is used for bird work[.]; and allowing the distribution and sale of monofilament netting of one-half to three-inch mesh to prevent the spread of coconut rhinoceros beetles." SECTION 2. (a)  The department of agriculture shall establish a program to provide monofilament netting of one-half to three-inch mesh, free of charge, to the public through local hardware stores to slow the growth and spread of coconut rhinoceros beetles in the State.  The department of agriculture shall supply local hardware stores with the nets and informational pamphlets on the use of the nets. (b) The informational pamphlets shall contain wording substantially similar to the following: "Net Specifics: Monofilament netting has been shown to entangle and exclude coconut rhinoceros beetles, but it does allow some through.  Use multiple loose layers of one-half to three-inch mesh." (c) The department of agriculture may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, necessary to implement this section. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment and implementation of the program established pursuant to section 2 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________